Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,286
Regulatory authority; determination of violations; use of federal regulations; when.

In determining whether food is being manufactured, processed, transported, distributed, offered for sale, or sold in violation of the adulteration, misbranding, deceptive packaging, or false advertising provisions of sections 81-2,282 to 81-2,285 or any other requirement of the Nebraska Pure Food Act which affects such food, the regulatory authority may utilize the appropriate definitions, standards, tolerances, standards of identity, standards of quality, or standards of fill of containers set out in the duly promulgated federal regulations applicable to food and food products if the regulatory authority finds that such federal regulations will adequately protect against the adulteration, misbranding, deceptive packaging, and false advertising of foods.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.32;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 55.